Utah statutes.
63J-1-602.4.   List of nonlapsing funds and accounts -- Title 61 through Title 63M.

(1)  Funds paid to the Division of Real Estate for the cost of a criminal background check for a mortgage loan license, as provided in Section 61-2c-202.

(2)  Funds paid to the Division of Real Estate for the cost of a criminal background check for principal broker, associate broker, and sales agent licenses, as provided in Section 61-2f-204.

(3)  Certain funds donated to the Department of Human Services, as provided in Section 62A-1-111.

(4)  Certain funds donated to the Division of Child and Family Services, as provided in Section 62A-4a-110.

(5)  Appropriations from the Choose Life Adoption Support Restricted Account created in Section 62A-4a-608.

(6)  Appropriations to the Division of Services for People with Disabilities, as provided in Section 62A-5-102.

(7)  A portion of the funds appropriated to the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, as provided in Section 63C-6-104.

(8)  Funding for the Medical Education Program administered by the Medical Education Council, as provided in Section 63C-8-102.

(9)  Certain money payable for commission expenses of the Pete Suazo Utah Athletic Commission, as provided under Section 63C-11-301.

(10)  Funds appropriated or collected for publishing the Division of Administrative Rules' publications, as provided in Section 63G-3-402.

(11)  The Immigration Act Restricted Account created in Section 63G-12-103.

(12)  Money received by the military installation development authority, as provided in Section 63H-1-504.

(13)  The appropriation to fund the Governor's Office of Economic Development's Enterprise Zone Act, as provided in Section 63M-1-416.

(14)  The Motion Picture Incentive Account created in Section 63M-1-1803.

(15)  Appropriations to the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority, created under Section 63M-2-301, as provided under Section 63M-2-302.



Amended by Chapter 18, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 303, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 338, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 438, 2011 General Session

